Massachusetts, session 194th, H4444.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding clause Forty-first C of section 5 of chapter 59 of the
General Laws, or of any other general or special law to the contrary, the town of Swampscott
may grant the exemption provided for in said clause Forty-first C to applicants who are disabled
persons age 69 or younger who have been domiciled in the town of Swampscott for a minimum
of 10 consecutive years immediately prior to the time of application; provided, that they meet all
other qualifications contained in said clause Forty-first C. The amount of the exemption and
qualifications relating to gross income or a person’s whole estate, as approved by the town,
applicable to taxpayers qualified for the exemption pursuant to said clause Forty-first C shall
apply to the same extent to applicants eligible in accordance with this act. For the purposes of
this act, disabled persons are individuals who have received a determination of disability from
the Social Security Administration’s Disability Determination Servicers prior to the time of
application.
of 2

SECTION 2. At any time after the effective date of this act, an annual town meeting of
the town of Swampscott may elect not to provide in the ensuing fiscal year the exemption
authorized by section 1. Such an election shall be effective until the exemption is reauthorized by
an annual town meeting of the town of Swampscott. Except as otherwise provided in section 1,
clause Forty-first C of section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws shall apply to the grant of an
exemption under authority of this act.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2